Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6276.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 42. (1) If a paroled prisoner has faithfully performed all of the conditions and obligations of parole for the period of time fixed in the order of parole , and has obeyed all of the rules and regulations adopted by the parole board, the prisoner has served the full sentence required. The parole board shall enter a final order of discharge and issue the paroled prisoner a certificate of discharge. (2) Parole shall must not be granted for a period less than 2 5 years in a case of murder, actual forcible rape, robbery armed,armed robbery, kidnapping, extortion, or breaking and entering an occupied dwelling in the nighttime unless the maximum time remaining to be served on the sentence is less than 2 5 years. (3) Parole shall must only be granted for life for a prisoner sentenced under section 520b(2)(b) 520b or 520c(1)(a) of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.520b and MCL 750.520c.